Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Attachment and Garnishment

§§ 1-21-301 through 1-21-333.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 125 through 157, related to attachment and garnishment. For present similar provisions, see §§

1-15-201

through

1-15-212

and

1-15-401

through

1-15-425

.